Utah statutes.
78A-6-204.   Administrator of the juvenile court -- Appointment -- Qualifications -- Powers and duties.

(1)  With the approval of the board, the state court administrator shall appoint a chief administrative officer of the juvenile court.

(2)  The chief administrative officer shall be selected on the basis of professional ability and experience in the field of public administration and shall possess an understanding of court procedures, as well as the nature and significance of probation services and other court services.

